Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-885.20
Broker, salesperson; change in
place of business or status; notify commission; fee.

(1)
Should the broker change his or her place of business, he or she shall forthwith
notify the commission in writing of such change.

(2) When a salesperson or associate broker leaves the employ of a broker,
the employing broker shall immediately forward the license of such employee
to the commission and shall furnish such information regarding the termination
of employment as the commission may require.

(3) When a salesperson or associate broker transfers from one employing
broker to another, when an associate broker changes his or her status from
associate broker to that of broker, or when a broker changes his or her status
to that of associate broker, a transfer fee to be established by the commission
of not more than fifty dollars shall be paid to the commission.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 20;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 18;

Laws 1990, LB 350, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 204, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 819, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB23, § 3.